Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 4 Employees of Certain State Departments

47-2-200.
[Reserved] Membership of heads of state departments or agencies who are constitutional officers; contributions; service credits; retirement allowances; survivors benefits.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 26, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 115, § 3.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-201.
[Reserved] Director status inhibiting eligibility for corresponding emeritus positions.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 27, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 115, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 999, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-202.
Eligibility for membership of officials and employees of the Department of Audits and Accounts; contributions.

The officials and employees of the Department of Audits and Accounts who are subject to the merit system of employment promulgated by the department are authorized to become members of the retirement system; and that department is authorized to pay all required contributions from funds appropriated for the operation of that department. Such payment shall be part of and in addition to the regular compensation allowed to the officials and employees of that department.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1195, § 1.

47-2-203.
Membership of certain employees of the Administrative Office of the Courts of the Judicial Council of Georgia and the Council of Juvenile Court Judges; contributions.

On and after July 1, 1990, the following shall be members of the retirement system:

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts of the Judicial Council of Georgia and any other person employed by the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Judicial Council of Georgia who is in a position which normally requires actual performance of duties during the full 12 months of the calendar year; and

The director of the Council of Juvenile Court Judges and any other person employed by the Council of Juvenile Court Judges who is in a position which normally requires actual performance of duties during the full 12 months of the calendar year.

Membership under this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334, relating to persons becoming members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 1982.

Employee contributions from members under this Code section for service on and after July 1, 1990, shall be deducted and remitted to the board of trustees by the appropriate employing authority. Employer contributions under this Code section for service on and after July 1, 1990, shall be payable from funds appropriated for the operation of the judicial branch of government; and such employer contributions shall be in addition to the regular compensation otherwise payable to such members.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 514, § 1.

47-2-204.
Members subject to provisions of Code Section 47-2-203 may receive credit for prior service.

Any member subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-203 may receive service credit for all prior service rendered as an employee of the Judicial Council of Georgia or its predecessor agency, the Governor’s Commission on Judicial Processes, or the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, provided that:

Such members shall pay a contribution of 1 1/2 percent per year on compensation received for each such year plus 4 1/2 percent interest on such employee contributions, compounded annually to the date of payment; and

An amount shall be paid to the retirement system from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the judicial branch of state government in an amount equal to the normal employer contribution which would have been paid on behalf of the member if the member had been a member of the retirement system during the period for which service is granted plus 4 1/2 percent interest on such employer contributions, compounded annually to the date of payment;

and provided, further, that no such service shall be deemed as creditable under any provisions of this chapter if such service has or will be used in the determination of any member’s eligibility for his retirement benefits or allowances for any other retirement system, excluding social security and those retirement programs covered under Public Law 810, 80th Congress, as amended. Any member claiming creditable service under this subsection shall make application to the board not later than June 30, 1993.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1151, § 1.